District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Emergency Medical Services Clarification Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 3a(d) of An Act To classify the officers and members of the fire
department of the District of Columbia, and for other purposes, effective April 15, 2008 (D.C.
Law 17-147; D.C. Official Code § 5-404.01(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d) The Medical Director shall:
“(1) Provide medical oversight, supervision, and final decision-making for all
clinical aspects of pre-hospital emergency medical services provided by the Department and the
Office of Unified Communications (“the Office”), including:
“(A) Written policies, procedures, and protocols, including dispatch
protocols and response-plans, for communicating with members of the public and emergency

medical services providers regarding pre-hospital medical care and other emergency services;
“(B) Medical training;
“(C) Reporting of performance metrics, including EMS dispatch
performance metrics;
“(D) Replacing, revising, or otherwise editing of the Office’s dispatch
system; and
“(E) Quality assurance of EMS dispatch and emergency medical services,
including pre-hospital emergency services and including implementation and supervision of
Continuous Quality Improvement (“CQI”) programs, wherein no documents, interviews, or other
information collected during a CQI process to improve operational performance shall be
disclosed or used as part of a disciplinary investigation and wherein no employee who self-
reports an issue to the CQI program shall be subject to disciplinary action based on the reported
issue;
“(2) Supervise the administration of pre-hospital medical care;
“(3) Work collaboratively with the Director and other personnel of the Office,
Fire Chief, Assistant and Deputy Fire Chiefs, and other personnel in the Department; and
“(4) Provide recommendations to the Mayor on the overall performance of the
Office and the Department.”.
Sec. 3. The Office of Unified Communications Establishment Act of 2004, effective
December 7, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-205; D.C. Official Code § 1-327.51 et seq.), is amended by
adding a new section 3205e to read as follows:
“Sec. 3205e. Emergency Medical Dispatch certification.
“(a) The Office shall require that all Office call takers and dispatchers obtain an EMD

certification within one year after being hired.
“(b) The Office shall require that all call takers and dispatchers already employed in the
Office obtain an EMD certification within one year after the effective date of the Emergency
Medical Services Clarification Amendment Act of 2026, as introduced on February 19, 2026
(Bill 26-XXX).
“(c) The Medical Director shall approve the EMD certification authority pursuant to the
Medical Director’s authority under section 3a(d) of An Act To classify the officers and members
of the fire department of the District of Columbia, and for other purposes, effective April 15,
2008 (D.C. Law 17-147; D.C. Official Code § 5-404.01(d)).
“(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “EMD certification” means a specialized
public safety designation that authorizes telecommunicators to perform medical triage and
provide life-saving pre-arrival instructions under the authority of the Medical Director, ensuring
a standardized, scientifically-validated response to medical emergencies.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).